Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.096

Disclosure of material tending to negate determination.

Whenever the commission determines that there is probable cause to believe that a judge or justice has violated a rule of judicial conduct or that the judge or justice suffers from a disability which is permanent or likely to become permanent and which seriously interferes with the performance of judicial duties, the commission shall disclose to the judge or justice any material or information within the commission's knowledge which tends to negate the determination of the commission, except as otherwise provided by a protective order.

[ 1989 c 367 s 10.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.